Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 204B.07, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Petitions for presidential electors and alternates. (a) This section does not apply to candidates for presidential elector or alternate nominated by major political parties. Major party candidates for presidential elector or alternate are certified under section 208.03. Other presidential electors or alternates are nominated by petition pursuant to this section. (b) On petitions nominating presidential electors or alternates, the names of the candidates for president and vice-president shall be added to the political party or political principle stated on the petition. One petition may be filed to nominate a slate of presidential electors equal in number to the number of electors to which the state is entitled and an alternate for each elector nominee.new text begin The petition must include a certification, under oath, that the candidates for president and vice president meet all eligibility requirements to be elected to the office, including those provided by the United States Constitution, article II, section 1, and Amendment XXII. The secretary of state must not place the name of a candidate for president or vice president on the general election ballot if the certification required by this subdivision is not provided on the petition, and the names of persons nominated as presidential electors and alternate presidential electors on behalf of that candidate are not eligible to be elected.new text end (c) In addition to the petition, each nominated candidate must submit a signed, notarized affidavit of candidacy for president or vice president that includes the following information: (1) the candidate's name in the form as it should appear on the ballot; (2) the candidate's campaign address, website, phone number, and email address; (3) the name of the political party or political principle stated on the petition; (4) the office sought by the candidate; and (5) a declaration that the candidate is aware of and will follow all applicable election laws and campaign finance laws. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 208.03, is amended to read: 208.03 NOMINATION OF PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS AND ALTERNATES. Presidential electors and alternates for the major political parties of this state shall be nominated by delegate conventions called and held under the supervision of the respective state central committees of the parties of this state. At least 71 days before the general election day the chair of the major political party shall certify to the secretary of state the names of the persons nominated as presidential electors, the names of persons nominated as alternate presidential electors, and the names of the party candidates for president and vice president. The chair shall also certifynew text begin , under oath,new text end that the party candidates for president and vice president have no affidavit on file as a candidate for any office in this state at the ensuing general electionnew text begin , and that the party candidates meet all eligibility requirements to be elected to the office, including those provided by the United States Constitution, article II, section 1, and Amendment XXIInew text end .new text begin The secretary of state must not place the name of a candidate for president or vice president on the general election ballot if the certifications required by this section are not provided, and the names of persons nominated as presidential electors and alternate presidential electors on behalf of that political party are not eligible to be elected.new text end